trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="llu/ir__vblex">
      
  <e>       <p><l>iríem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iria</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iríeu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iries</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>irien</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iria</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>irem</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iré</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ireu</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iràs</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>iran</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>irà</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>írem</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>íreu</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ires</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïres</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iren</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïren</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>im</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïm</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>im</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïm</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eix</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ix</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïx</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eix</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ix</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïx</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eixin</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>isquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïsquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eixin</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>isquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïsquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eixi</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esqui</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>isca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïsca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eixi</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esqui</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>isca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïsca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>íem</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïa</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>íeu</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ies</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïes</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ien</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïen</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïa</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      

<e lm="brunzir">         <i>brunz</i><par n="llu/ir__vblex"/></e>
